District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.08

Public notification of emergencies.

The Agency shall establish and implement an effective homeland security public warning and information capability that can be used during emergencies to warn residents timely and to disseminate emergency information to residents, both indoors and outdoors, at any time and regardless of residents’ special needs. The Agency shall also pay particular attention to the needs of senior citizens and low-income residents in establishing an effective homeland security public warning and information capability.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 208
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794